Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

23-1-1.
Equity jurisdiction vested in superior courts and State-wide Business Court.

All equity jurisdiction shall be vested in the superior courts of the several counties and in the Georgia State-wide Business Court as provided in Code Section 15-5A-3.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 467; Code 1863, § 3013; Code 1868, § 3025; Code 1873, § 3080; Code 1882, § 3080; Civil Code 1895, § 3921; Civil Code 1910, § 4518; Code 1933, § 37-101; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 3-4/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, added “and in the Georgia State-wide Business Court as provided in Code Section 15-5A-3” at the end of this Code section.

Cross references.

Exercise of judicial power, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. I, Para. IV.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

23-1-2.
Scope of equity jurisdiction; modes of remedy.

Generally, equity jurisprudence embraces the same matters of jurisdiction and modes of remedy as were allowed and practiced in England.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3033; Code 1868, § 3045; Code 1873, § 3100; Code 1882, § 3100; Civil Code 1895, § 3945; Civil Code 1910, § 4542; Code 1933, § 37-124.

23-1-3.
Grounds for equity jurisdiction.

Equity jurisdiction is established and allowed for the protection and relief of parties where, from any peculiar circumstances, the operation of the general rules of law would be deficient in protecting from anticipated wrong or relieving for injuries done.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3014; Code 1868, § 3026; Code 1873, § 3081; Code 1882, § 3081; Civil Code 1895, § 3922; Civil Code 1910, § 4519; Code 1933, § 37-102.

23-1-4.
Effect of legal remedy on exercise of jurisdiction.

Equity will not take cognizance of a plain legal right where an adequate and complete remedy is provided by law; but the mere privilege of a party to bring an action at law or the existence of a common-law remedy not as complete or effectual as the equitable relief shall not deprive equity of jurisdiction.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3028; Code 1868, § 3040; Code 1873, § 3095; Code 1882, § 3095; Civil Code 1895, § 3941; Civil Code 1910, § 4538; Code 1933, § 37-120.

23-1-5.
Concurrent jurisdiction of law and equity.

Where law and equity have concurrent jurisdiction, whichever first takes jurisdiction shall retain it, unless a good reason shall be given for the interference of equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3029; Code 1868, § 3041; Code 1873, § 3096; Code 1882, § 3096; Civil Code 1895, § 3943; Civil Code 1910, § 4540; Code 1933, § 37-122.

23-1-6.
Equity follows the law.

Equity is ancillary, not antagonistic, to the law; hence, equity follows the law where the rule of law is applicable and follows the analogy of the law where no rule is directly applicable.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3016; Code 1868, § 3028; Code 1873, § 3083; Code 1882, § 3083; Civil Code 1895, § 3923; Civil Code 1910, § 4520; Code 1933, § 37-103.

23-1-7.
Equity seeks to do justice.

Equity seeks always to do complete justice. Hence, having the parties before the court rightfully, it will proceed to give full relief to all parties in reference to the subject matter of the action, provided the court has jurisdiction for that purpose.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3018; Code 1868, § 3030; Code 1873, § 3085; Code 1882, § 3085; Civil Code 1895, § 3925; Civil Code 1910, § 4522; Code 1933, § 37-105.

23-1-8.
Equity cConsiders done what ought to be done.

Equity considers that done which ought to be done and directs its relief accordingly.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3019; Code 1868, § 3031; Code 1873, § 3086; Code 1882, § 3086; Civil Code 1895, § 3926; Civil Code 1910, § 4523; Code 1933, § 37-106.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

23-1-9.
Nature of equity is equality.

In many cases, equality is equity in the distribution of equitable assets.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3023; Code 1868, § 3035; Code 1873, § 3090; Code 1882, § 3090; Civil Code 1895, § 3930; Civil Code 1910, § 4527; Code 1933, § 37-110.

Law reviews.

For note, “Georgia Becomes A Quasi Community Property State,” see 17 Ga. St. B.J. 134 (1981).

23-1-10.
Who would have equity must do equity.

He who would have equity must do equity and must give effect to all equitable rights of the other party respecting the subject matter of the action.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3017; Code 1868, § 3029; Code 1873, § 3084; Code 1882, § 3084; Civil Code 1895, § 3924; Civil Code 1910, § 4521; Code 1933, § 37-104.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the historical background of the doctrine of tender and the application in Georgia of tender requirements, and proposing reforms, see 21 Mercer L. Rev. 413 (1969).

For article discussing application of the principle that he who would have equity must do equity to taxpayer’s suits, see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 305 (1971).

23-1-11.
Effect of equal equities; effect of unequal equities.

Where equities are equal, the law shall prevail. If equities are unequal, the superior equity shall prevail. Superior diligence as to time will create such inequality.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3020; Code 1868, § 3032; Code 1873, § 3087; Code 1882, § 3087; Civil Code 1895, § 3927; Civil Code 1910, § 4524; Code 1933, § 37-107.

Law reviews.

For note, the voluntary-payment doctrine in Georgia, see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 893 (1982).

23-1-12.
Equity of misled party superior.

The equity of a party who has been misled is superior to that of the person who willfully misleads such party.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3022; Code 1868, § 3034; Code 1873, § 3089; Code 1882, § 3089; Civil Code 1895, § 3929; Civil Code 1910, § 4526; Code 1933, § 37-109.

23-1-13.
Volunteer’s equity inferior.

The equity under trust or contract for value is superior to that of a mere volunteer.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3021; Code 1868, § 3033; Code 1873, § 3088; Code 1882, § 3088; Civil Code 1895, § 3928; Civil Code 1910, § 4525; Code 1933, § 37-108.

23-1-14.
Who bears loss from act of third party.

When one of two innocent persons must suffer by the act of a third person, he who put it in the power of the third person to inflict the injury shall bear the loss.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3940; Civil Code 1910, § 4537; Code 1933, § 37-113.

History of Code section.

The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in Blaisdell v. Bohr,

77 Ga. 381

(1886).

23-1-15.
Where both parties equally at fault; where fault is unequal.

When both parties are equally at fault, equity will not interfere but will leave them where it finds them. The rule is otherwise if the fault of one decidedly overbalances that of the other.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3026; Code 1868, § 3038; Code 1873, § 3093; Code 1882, § 3093; Civil Code 1895, § 3937; Civil Code 1910, § 4534; Code 1933, § 37-112.

Law reviews.

For note, the voluntary-payment doctrine in Georgia, see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 893 (1982).

23-1-16.
Taking with notice of equity.

He who takes with notice of an equity takes subject to that equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3024; Code 1868, § 3036; Code 1873, § 3091; Code 1882, § 3091; Civil Code 1895, § 3932; Civil Code 1910, § 4529; Code 1933, § 37-115.

23-1-17.
Scope of notice; ignorance due to negligence.

Notice sufficient to excite attention and put a party on inquiry shall be notice of everything to which it is afterwards found that such inquiry might have led. Ignorance of a fact due to negligence shall be equivalent to knowledge in fixing the rights of parties.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3933; Civil Code 1910, § 4530; Code 1933, § 37-116.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Hunt v. Dunn,

74 Ga. 120

(1884) and Schmidt v. Block,

76 Ga. 823

(1886).

Law reviews.

For article, “A Comprehensive Analysis of Georgia RICO,” see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 537 (1993).

For article, “Noticing the Bankruptcy Sale: The Purchased Property May Not Be as ‘Free and Clear of All Liens, Claims and Encumberances’ as You Think,”
see 15 (No. 5) Ga. St. B.J. 12 (2010).

For article, “Eleventh Circuit Survey:
January 1, 2013 — December 31, 2013:
Casenote:
The Decline and Fall of Constructive Notice,” see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 1203 (2014).

23-1-18.
Pending action as notice; effect on purchaser.

Decrees ordinarily bind only parties and their privies; but a pending action shall be a general notice of an equity or claim to all the world from the time the action is filed and docketed. If the same is duly prosecuted and is not collusive, one who purchases pending the final outcome of the litigation shall be affected by the decree rendered therein.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3936; Civil Code 1910, § 4533; Code 1933, § 37-117.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Carmichael v. Foster,

69 Ga. 372

(1882), Wilson v. Wright,

72 Ga. 848

(1884), and Weems v. Harrold, Johnson & Co.,

75 Ga. 866

(1885).

23-1-19.
Sale to one without notice; sale by one without notice.

If one with notice sells to one without notice, the latter shall be protected. If one without notice sells to one with notice, the latter shall be protected, as otherwise a bona fide purchaser might be deprived of selling his property for full value.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3938; Civil Code 1910, § 4535; Code 1933, § 37-114.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Collins v. Heath,

34 Ga. 443

(1866).

Cross references.

Power of person possessing voidable title to transfer goods to good faith purchaser for value, §

11-2-403

.

23-1-20.
Interference with bona fide purchaser.

A bona fide purchaser for value without notice of an equity will not be interfered with by equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3025; Code 1868, § 3037; Code 1873, § 3092; Code 1882, § 3092; Civil Code 1895, § 3934; Civil Code 1910, § 4531; Code 1933, § 37-111.

Law reviews.

For note, “Vesting Title in a Murderer:
Where is the Equity in the Georgia Supreme Court’s Interpretation of the Slayer Statute in Levenson?,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 877 (2011).

23-1-21.
Compulsion to litigate.

Equity will not force persons to litigate in order to have done what they ought to do and are willing to do voluntarily.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3935; Civil Code 1910, § 4532; Code 1933, § 37-118.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Sperry & Niles v. Haslam,

57 Ga. 412

(1876) and Blalock v. Newhill,

78 Ga. 245

,

1 S.E. 383

(1887).

23-1-22.
Interference with creditor.

A diligent creditor shall not needlessly be interfered with in the prosecution of his legal remedies.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3942; Civil Code 1910, § 4539; Code 1933, § 37-121.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Burgwyn Bros. Tobacco Co. v. Bentley & Co.,

90 Ga. 508

,

16 S.E. 216

(1892).

23-1-23.
Construction of conditions; relief against forfeitures.

Where the rules of construction will allow, equity seeks always to construe conditions subsequent into covenants and to relieve against forfeitures.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3048; Code 1868, § 3060; Code 1873, § 3115; Code 1882, § 3115; Civil Code 1895, § 3971; Civil Code 1910, § 4568; Code 1933, § 37-216.

23-1-24.
When election between benefits compelled.

A case of election arises whenever a person is entitled to one of two benefits, to each of which he has legal title; but the enforcement of both would be unconscionable and inequitable to others having claims upon the same property or fund. In such cases equity may compel an election.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3092; Code 1868, § 3104; Code 1873, § 3161; Code 1882, § 3161; Civil Code 1895, § 4012; Civil Code 1910, § 4609; Code 1933, § 37-501.

Cross references.

Elections relating to deeds, §

44-5-37

.

Elections relating to wills, § 53-2-111 et seq.

23-1-25.
Laches.

Equity gives no relief to one whose long delay renders the ascertainment of the truth difficult, even when no legal limitation bars the right.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3027; Code 1868, § 3039; Code 1873, § 3094; Code 1882, § 3094; Civil Code 1895, § 3939; Civil Code 1910, § 4536; Code 1933, § 37-119.

Cross references.

Authority of courts of equity to interpose equitable bar owing to lapse of time and laches of complainant, §

9-3-3

.

Tolling of limitations due to fraud of defendant or those under whom one claims, §

9-3-96

.